Louisiana, session 2026, HB590.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:403.3(B)(2)(c) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§403.3. Identification stickers and decals; deaf and hard of hearing; autism spectrum
disorder; mental, physical, or developmental disability
* * *
B.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(c) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, may create specially designed envelopes to be provided to drivers with
mental, physical, developmental disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder or their
parents or legal guardians that provide proof as required by Subsection C of this
Section. The envelopes may include guidelines to assist law enforcement officers
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 590 ENROLLED
in recognizing and effectively communicating with drivers with disabilities during
traffic stops.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.